Massachusetts, session 194th, H2880.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the Massachusetts teachers’ retirement board shall credit Heather
Leger, a member of the Massachusetts teachers’ retirement system, with not more than 2 years of
creditable service for her part-time work with the nonpublic Applewild school in the city of
Fitchburg between the years of 2002 and 2007, inclusive, for the purpose of determining her
superannuation retirement allowance pursuant to said chapter 32. The board shall confirm the
exact dates of Heather Leger’s work and credit her with creditable service for the amount of
actual time worked during this period in accordance with section 4 of said chapter 32.
of 2

SECTION 2. Eligibility for the creditable service authorized in section 1 shall be
conditioned upon payment by Heather Leger to the Massachusetts teachers’ retirement system, in
an amount equal to that which would have been withheld as regular deductions from her regular
compensation for such previous service, in 1 lump sum or installments, as the Massachusetts
teachers’ retirement board shall prescribe.
of 2